Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 468.
SECTION 2. The Department of Environmental Quality may accept payments  by credit
card for  any products or services offered by the department. The department may add a fee
to the amount of any payment made by credit card in an amount reasonably  calculated to
offset the impact to the department of financial institution fees related to  credit card
transactions.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality may impose a surcharge of
four percent on  each fee or invoice generated using the environmental data management
system.
(2) Notwithstanding the surcharge percentage rate described in subsection (1)  of this
section, the department shall reduce the surcharge percentage rate below four percent for
a biennium if the department determines that the reduced  surcharge percentage rate will
be sufficient to defray the costs to the department  of licensing and hosting the environ-
mental data management system during the  biennium. If the department determines that a
reduced surcharge percentage rate will be sufficient, the department shall issue  an order on
or before January 1 of the odd-numbered year setting forth the  reduced surcharge percent-
age rate for the following biennium. If the department reduces  the surcharge percentage
rate under this subsection, the surcharge percentage  rate shall revert to four percent after
the end of the biennium, unless the department issues an additional order  as provided in this
subsection.
(3) If the department reduces  the surcharge percentage rate as described in subsection
(2) of this section, the department shall notify all persons with an active account within  the
environmental data management system of the reduced surcharge percentage rate.
(4) Surcharge moneys collected by the department under this section  shall be included
in the fee or invoice payment associated with the surcharge and initially deposited  into the
same fund or account as the fee or invoice payment  associated with the surcharge. The de-
partment shall periodically transfer all surcharge moneys from  the funds or accounts into
which surcharge moneys were initially  deposited to the Environmental Data Management
System Fund established under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 58 (SB 58-B) Page 1
SECTION 4. The Environmental Data  Management System Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. The Environmental Data
Management System Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under  section 3 of this
2021 Act and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.  Moneys in the Environmental Data Manage-
ment System Fund are continuously appropriated  to the Department of Environmental
Quality for the maintenance and operations costs associated with the department’s environ-
mental data management system.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 58 (SB 58-B) Page 2